Illinois, session 104th, SB2493.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Electric Supplier Act is amended by adding 5Sections 17, 17.1, 17.2, 17.3, 17.4, 17.5, 17.6, and 17.8 as 6follows: 7    (220 ILCS 30/17 new)8    Sec. 17. Short title. This Section through Section 17.8 of 9this Act may be referred to as the Electrical Service 10Broadband Deployment and Access Law. 11    (220 ILCS 30/17.1 new)12    Sec. 17.1. Purpose. This Law authorizes certain electric 13cooperatives to deploy broadband infrastructure and to provide 14broadband service to residential and business locations within 15an electric cooperative's service territory. 16    (220 ILCS 30/17.2 new)17    Sec. 17.2. Definitions. As used in this Law:18    "Broadband grant recipient" means an electric cooperative 19that has received grant funding pursuant to any State or 20federal grant program with the purpose of expanding broadband 21deployment of and access to broadband services.  SB2493 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09146 AAS 19202 b1    "Broadband infrastructure" means aboveground or 2underground wires, cables, fiber optic lines, conduit, pipe, 3innerduct, or microduct for fiber optic or other cables and 4facilities, including ancillary equipment such as power 5supplies, backhaul, and support structures, that are used in 6the provision of broadband service.7    "Broadband service" means broadband Internet access 8service as defined in 47 CFR 8.1(b).9    "Deploy" means, with respect to broadband infrastructure, 10to install, operate, maintain, access, inspect, upgrade, 11replace, repair, remove, and perform activities ancillary to 12those activities. 13    "Electric easement" means any recorded or unrecorded 14easement held by any electricity supplier for the siting of 15electric facilities, regardless of whether the easement is for 16the exclusive benefit of the electricity supplier or for use 17in connection with other utility services and regardless of 18whether the electricity supplier provides other utility 19services.20    "Grant service area" means the defined location in the 21broadband grant where the broadband grant recipient is to 22provide broadband service subject to the broadband grant.23    "Property owner" does not include a public utility as 24defined in Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act. 25    (220 ILCS 30/17.3 new)  SB2493 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 09146 AAS 19202 b1    Sec. 17.3. Rights granted to electric cooperative 2broadband grant recipients. 3    (a) In the grant service area, a broadband grant 4recipient, subject to the recipient's broadband grant, may 5access and use (i) any existing electric easement held or 6controlled by the broadband grant recipient or (ii) any other 7existing electric easement contingent upon an agreement with 8the easement holder or controller for the delivery of 9broadband service by the broadband grant recipient.10    (b) If the proper permits are acquired by State and local 11authorities, no property owner of property located within the 12grant service area shall forbid or prevent a proposed 13broadband grant recipient from entering upon the property for 14purposes of and in connection with the deployment of broadband 15infrastructure, nor shall any such property owner forbid or 16prohibit the broadband grant recipient from deploying upon, 17beneath, or over that property broadband infrastructure 18utilized by the broadband grant recipient for such broadband 19service. The property owner may be entitled to the payment of 20just compensation by that broadband grant recipient as 21provided in Section 17.4, and the broadband grant recipient 22shall indemnify the owner of the property for any physical 23damage caused by deployment of the broadband infrastructure 24and service. 25    (220 ILCS 30/17.4 new)  SB2493 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 09146 AAS 19202 b1    Sec. 17.4. Notice and compensation.2    (a) The broadband grant recipient must notify the property 3owner in writing by sending notification to the property 4owner's address specified in the online or publicly available 5records of the applicable county assessor (i) by the United 6States Postal Service, certified mail, return receipt 7requested; (ii) by a designated private delivery service, as 8defined by the Internal Revenue Service, that provides the 9same function as certified mail with return receipt; or (iii) 10by personally serving the notification. The property owner 11shall be notified at least 14 days, but not more than 60 days, 12prior to the broadband grant recipient entering upon such 13property for purposes of or in connection with the deployment 14of broadband infrastructure. The notice shall include the 15following information:16        (1) the address of the property;17        (2) the name of the broadband grant recipient and 18    contact information for notice to the broadband grant 19    recipient;20        (3) the anticipated date of the proposed installation, 21    maintenance, repair, or removal of the broadband 22    infrastructure and projected length of time required to 23    complete the installation, maintenance, or repair;24        (4) information as to the time within which the owner 25    may give notice and demand just compensation under this 26    Section if the property owner believes that the property   SB2493 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 09146 AAS 19202 b1    is diminished in value due to the burden on the property 2    from the expanded use of the electric easement or 3    right-of-way;4        (5) the manner and method of, and the detailed design 5    and construction plans for, such installation, 6    maintenance, repair, and removal, including the location 7    of the proposed entry and path of broadband facilities 8    proposed to be placed, repaired, maintained, or removed 9    upon the property;10        (6) for installation of broadband infrastructure that 11    will occur overhead, the details regarding how the 12    broadband infrastructure installation will conform to 13    applicable National Electric Safety Code standards for 14    overhead clearance; and15        (7) for installation of broadband infrastructure that 16    will occur below ground, a statement absolving the 17    property owner or the property owner's tenant from 18    liability for any damages to broadband infrastructure that 19    occur in the event of normal property use, including 20    normal farming operations if the property is used for 21    farming purposes.22    (b) If the property owner intends to demand just 23compensation, the property owner must serve written notice 24thereof upon the broadband grant recipient within 45 days 25after the anticipated date of broadband deployment as provided 26in the notice to the property owner. Unless timely notice as   SB2493 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 09146 AAS 19202 b1provided in this subsection is given by the property owner to 2the broadband grant recipient, it will be conclusively 3presumed that the property owner does not claim just 4compensation for the burden on the property from the expanded 5use of the electric easement or the right-of-way.6    (c) Any property owner described in subsection (a) who has 7given timely written notice to the broadband provider, as 8provided in subsection (b), may assert a claim for just 9compensation for diminution in value of the property from the 10expanded use of the electric easement or right-of-way. A 11property owner may bring suit in an applicable circuit court 12with jurisdiction to enforce a claim for just compensation and 13to have the amount of just compensation determined by a jury. 14Such action must be commenced within 6 months of delivery of 15the broadband grant recipient's original notice of intent to 16deploy broadband infrastructure. A property owner who has not 17given timely notice as provided in subsection (b) is barred 18from asserting such a claim.19    (d) Neither the property owner's notice to demand just 20compensation, nor the property owner's assertion of a specific 21claim for just compensation, nor the initiation of any legal 22action to enforce the claim of just compensation shall delay 23or impair the right of the broadband grant recipient to deploy 24broadband infrastructure and provide broadband service within 25or upon, beneath, or over property described in subsection 26(a).   SB2493 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 09146 AAS 19202 b1    (220 ILCS 30/17.5 new)2    Sec. 17.5. Rights-of-way. Conditional upon acquiring the 3proper agreement or permit with the highway right-of-way 4controller or holder, a broadband grant recipient may install, 5maintain, and use broadband infrastructure below ground along 6a highway right-of-way within the grant service area. The 7broadband grant recipient shall comply with all applicable 8provisions of Section 9-113 of the Illinois Highway Code and 9relevant administrative rules. No property owner of property 10located within the grant service area shall forbid or prevent 11such proposed broadband grant recipient from entering upon 12such property for purposes of and in connection with the 13deployment of broadband infrastructure, nor shall any such 14property owner forbid or prohibit the covered provider from 15deploying upon, beneath, or over such property broadband 16infrastructure utilized by the covered provider for providing 17broadband service. The property owner may be entitled to 18payment of just compensation by that broadband grant 19recipient, as provided in Section 17.4, and the broadband 20grant recipient shall indemnify the owner of such property for 21any physical damage caused by the deployment of such broadband 22infrastructure and service. Nothing in this amendatory Act of 23the 104th General Assembly shall be construed as reducing the 24ability of the Department of Transportation from exercising 25its authority to (1) approve or deny permits for use of its   SB2493 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 09146 AAS 19202 b1right-of-way, (2) collect fees and compensation required as 2part of the Department of Transportation's administrative 3rules, and (3) manage the use of its right-of-way. 4    (220 ILCS 30/17.6 new)5    Sec. 17.6. Labor standards and protection. Electric 6cooperative broadband grant recipients under this Law, 7including any contractors and subcontractors of the broadband 8grant recipient, performing work subject to this Law shall, 9when applicable, pay prevailing wages and benefits to workers, 10comply with the Davis-Bacon Act, and collect any required 11certified payrolls. A broadband grant recipient shall comply 12with all requirements set forth in the Prevailing Wage Act, 13including, but not limited to, inserting into all contracts 14for construction a stipulation that not less than the 15prevailing rate of wages, as applicable to the project, shall 16be paid to all laborers, workers, and mechanics performing 17work under the contract, and requiring all surety bonds with 18contractors to include a provision that guarantees the 19faithful performance of the prevailing wage clause in the 20contract. The electric cooperative shall report to the 21Department of Labor on its compliance with the Prevailing Wage 22Act on a monthly basis. Apprentices performing work subject to 23this Law shall perform either 10% of the total labor hours 24actually worked in each prevailing wage classification or 10% 25of the estimated labor hours in each prevailing wage   SB2493 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 09146 AAS 19202 b1classification, whichever is less. 2    (220 ILCS 30/17.8 new)3    Sec. 17.8. Sunset. The rights and obligations of broadband 4project grant recipients and landowners set forth in this Law 5do not apply on and after January 1, 2030. 6    Section 10. The Broadband Infrastructure Advancement Act 7is amended by changing Section 4-20 as follows: 8    (220 ILCS 81/4-20)9    Sec. 4-20. Use of other broadband funds. The Department of 10Commerce and Economic Opportunity, the Office of Broadband, or 11any other State agency, board, office, or commission 12appropriated funding to provide grants for broadband 13deployment, broadband expansion, broadband access, broadband 14affordability, and broadband improvement projects must 15establish program eligibility and selection criteria by 16administrative rules.17    The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity, when 18evaluating grant applications for the deployment of broadband 19network, must consider the expediency with which a project can 20be completed and broadband Internet access service delivered. 21Projects for which the Department awards grants to deploy 22broadband service in unserved areas or underserved areas shall 23include, as a project expense, costs necessarily incurred for   SB2493 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 09146 AAS 19202 b1the acquisition of any license, easement, right-of-way, or 2other property interest, or for the use of or for access to 3public utility (as defined in Section 3-105 of the Public 4Utilities Act) owned or State or local government owned 5infrastructure or assets for such project that are used 6directly in the provision of broadband service to locations in 7such unserved or underserved areas. 8(Source: P.A. 102-699, eff. 4-19-22.) 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.